Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.050

Powers and duties generally.

The commission shall meet, study, plan, and advise the governor, the various departments of the state and the state legislature and shall make such recommendations as it deems proper for the cultural development of the state of Washington.

[ 1985 c 317 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.46.050. Prior: 1961 c 301 s 5.]